Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-8312
Change in information; notice to director.

Each discount medical plan organization shall provide the director notice of any change in the discount medical plan organization's name, address, telephone number, principal business address or mailing address, or Internet web site address no less than thirty days before such change is to occur.

Laws 2008, LB855, § 44.